Washington statutes.
RCW 17.34.040

Compact administrator.

The compact administrator for this state shall be the director of agriculture. The duties of the compact administrator shall be deemed a regular part of his or her office.

[ 2011 c 336 s 471; 1969 ex.s. c 130 s 4.]